Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.047

Crime victim and witness assistance account.

(1) The state crime victim and witness assistance account is created in the state treasury. The account shall consist of funds appropriated by the legislature for comprehensive crime victim and witness programs under RCW 7.68.035. The purpose of the account is to mitigate to fiscal impact from the elimination of the crime victim penalty assessment on juveniles and indigent adults in chapter 449, Laws of 2023.

(2) Pursuant to appropriation, each quarter, the state treasurer must distribute moneys deposited in the state crime victim and witness assistance account to counties on the basis of each county's distribution factor under RCW 82.14.310.

(3) Counties may expend moneys distributed under this section only for purposes specified in RCW 7.68.035.

[ 2023 c 449 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 449: See note following RCW 13.40.058.